test/src/morphology/V-saama78_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `saama: # Verb (78) `saama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `saama+V+Inf/mA: `saama
     `saama+V+Inf: saiaq
     `saama+V+ActPrtPrc: saanuq
     `saama+V+PssPrtPrc: saad
     `saama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: saa
     `saama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: [saa, saasõ]
     `saama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `sai(õ)
     `saama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `sai(õ)
